Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10-109] Disclosure of health
care coverage and benefits. In order to ensure that all individuals
understand their health care options and are able to make informed decisions,
all insurers shall provide current and prospective insureds with written
disclosure of coverages and benefits, including information on coverage
principles and any exclusions or restrictions on coverage.

The information provided shall be current,
understandable, and available prior to the issuance of a policy, and upon
request after the policy has been issued. [L 1996, c 274, §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next